Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 7. Originator Surety Fund.

Sec. 06.60.500.
Mortgage loan originator surety fund.

The mortgage loan originator surety fund is established as a separate account in the general fund. The purpose of the fund is to pay fund claims against mortgage loan originator licensees.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 57 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.510.
Composition of fund.

The fund consists of appropriations of payments made by mortgage loan originator licensees under AS

06.60.550

, filing fees for fund claims retained under AS

06.60.620

, income earned on the investment of the money in the fund, and money deposited in the fund by the department under AS

06.60.740

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 58 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.520.
Use of fund.

The legislature may appropriate the money collected in the fund under AS

06.60.510

to the department to implement AS

06.60.500

—

06.60.750

, including paying claims, holding hearings, and incurring legal expenses and other expenses directly related to fund claims and the operation of the fund. Nothing in AS

06.60.500

—

06.60.750

creates a dedicated fund.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.60.530.
Fund report.

Every six months, the department shall provide a written report to the director of the office of management and budget on the activities of the fund, the balances in the fund, interest earned on the fund, and interest returned to the fund.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.60.540.
Approval required. [Repealed, § 87 ch 61 SLA 2010.]

Sec. 06.60.550.
Required fund fees.

A person who applies for or renews a mortgage loan originator license shall pay to the department, in addition to the fees required by AS

06.60.035

, a fund fee established by the department.

Every two years, if the department determines that the average balance in the fund during the previous two years was less than $250,000 or more than $500,000, the department shall, unless the department waives the adjustment, adjust the fund fee so that the average balance of the fund during the next two years is anticipated to be an amount that is not less than $250,000 or more than $500,000. In this subsection, “average balance” means the average balance in the fund after the department deducts anticipated expenditures for claims against the fund and for hearing and legal expenses directly related to fund operations and claims.

At least once a month, the department shall pay the fees collected under this section into the general fund. These payments shall be credited to the fund.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a mortgage loan originator licensee who obtains an initial mortgage loan originator license when the department has reduced the fund fee to nothing shall nonetheless pay the fund fee established by regulation to the department for the first year of the mortgage loan originator license.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am §§ 59, 60 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Cross references. —

For the amount of the fees required by (a) and (d) of this section pending the effective date of regulations to be adopted by the department under the provisions of this section, see § 89(3) and (4), ch. 61, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 06.60.560.
Claim for reimbursement.

In addition to any other remedies available to the person, a person may seek reimbursement for a loss suffered in a mortgage loan transaction as a result of fraud, misrepresentation, deceit, or the wrongful conversion of money by a mortgage loan originator licensee and is eligible to be reimbursed under AS

06.60.500

—

06.60.750

for the loss from money appropriated for that purpose.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 61 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.570.
Submission of fund claim.

To seek reimbursement under AS

06.60.560

, a person shall submit a fund claim to the department for the reimbursement on a form furnished by the department. The person must file the fund claim within two years after the occurrence of the fraud, misrepresentation, deceit, or conversion that is claimed as the basis for the reimbursement.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.60.580.
Form and contents of fund claim.

The form for a fund claim shall be executed under penalty of unsworn falsification in the second degree and must include

the name and address of each mortgage loan originator licensee involved;

the amount of the alleged loss;

the date or period of time during which the alleged loss occurred;

the date when the alleged loss was discovered;

the name and address of the claimant; and

a general statement of the facts related to the fund claim.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 3 ch 58 SLA 2010; am § 62 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Cross references. --

For the crime of unsworn falsification in the second degree, see AS

11.56.210

.

Administrative Code. —

For originator surety fund, see 3 AAC 14, art. 7.

Sec. 06.60.590.
Claim hearing.

Except as otherwise provided by AS

06.60.610

, a hearing on a fund claim shall be handled by the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

).

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.60.600.
Filing and distribution of claim.

At least 20 days before a hearing is held on the fund claim by the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

), the department shall send a copy of the claim filed with the department to

each mortgage loan originator licensee alleged to have committed the misconduct resulting in the alleged loss;

the employer of the mortgage loan originator licensee described in (1) of this section; and

any other parties involved in the mortgage loan transaction that is the subject of the fund claim.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 63 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For originator surety fund, see 3 AAC 14, art. 7.

Sec. 06.60.610.
Election to use small claims court.

Within 30 days after receiving a copy of a fund claim under AS

06.60.600

, a mortgage loan originator licensee against whom a claim is made may elect to defend the fund claim as a small claims action in district court under District Court Rules of Civil Procedure if the claim does not exceed the small claims jurisdictional limit.

A mortgage loan originator licensee who elects under (a) of this section to defend a fund claim in district court under the small claims rules may not revoke the election without the consent of the person who filed the fund claim.

On receipt of a valid written election under (a) of this section, the department shall dismiss the fund claim filed with the department and notify the person who filed the fund claim that the person who filed the fund claim must bring a small claims action in the appropriate district court.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am §§ 64, 65 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.620.
Filing fee.

A person who files a fund claim under AS

06.60.570

shall pay the department a filing fee of $250 when the person files the fund claim.

The department shall refund the filing fee required under this section if the

department makes an award to the claimant;

fund claim is dismissed under AS

06.60.610

; or

fund claim is withdrawn by the claimant before the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

) holds a hearing on the fund claim.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For originator surety fund, see 3 AAC 14, art. 7.

Sec. 06.60.630.
Department contracts.

When the department receives a fund claim, the department may contract under AS 36.30 (State Procurement Code) with an investigator, an accountant, an attorney, or another person necessary for the department to process the fund claim. A contract may cover more than one fund claim.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.60.640.
Defense of claim.

When the department receives a fund claim, the department shall allow each mortgage loan originator licensee against whom the claim is made an opportunity to file with the department, within seven days after receipt of notification of the fund claim under AS

06.60.600

, a written statement in opposition to the fund claim and a request for a hearing.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 66 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For originator surety fund, see 3 AAC 14, art. 7.

Sec. 06.60.650.
Standard of proof.

A person who submits a fund claim under AS

06.60.570

bears the burden of establishing by a preponderance of the evidence that the person suffered a loss in a mortgage loan transaction as a result of fraud, misrepresentation, deceit, or the conversion of trust funds by a mortgage loan originator licensee and the extent of those losses.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 67 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For originator surety fund, see 3 AAC 14, art. 7.

Sec. 06.60.660.
Postponement.

The department may postpone its consideration of a fund claim until after a hearing under AS

06.60.200

or

06.60.590

or until the completion of a pending court proceeding.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.60.670.
Nonapplication.

AS

06.60.630

—

06.60.660

do not apply to a fund claim that is dismissed under AS

06.60.610

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For originator surety fund, see 3 AAC 14, art. 7.

Sec. 06.60.680.
Findings and payment.

At the conclusion of the department’s consideration of a claim made under AS

06.60.570

, the department shall issue a written report that provides the department’s findings of fact and conclusions of law.

If the department determines that the claimant has suffered a loss in a mortgage loan transaction as a result of fraud, misrepresentation, deceit, or the wrongful conversion of money by a mortgage loan originator licensee, the department may award the person who filed the fund claim reimbursement from money appropriated to the fund.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 68 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For originator surety fund, see 3 AAC 14, art. 7.

Sec. 06.60.690.
Fund operations.

The department shall deposit into the fund money that the department recovers from a mortgage loan originator licensee under AS

06.60.745

. The department may not consider amounts paid from the fund for hearing or legal expenses when determining the maximum reimbursement to be awarded under AS

06.60.710

or the maximum liability for fund claims under AS

06.60.710

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 69 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.700.
Payment of small claims judgment.

If a fund claim dismissed under AS

06.60.610

results in a monetary award against a mortgage loan originator licensee, the department may pay, subject to AS

06.60.710

and

06.60.720

, any outstanding portion of the small claims judgment from money appropriated to the department for the purpose.

Before making payment under (a) of this section, the person who received the award shall file with the department a copy of the final judgment and an affidavit stating that more than 30 days have elapsed since the judgment became final and that the judgment has not yet been satisfied by the mortgage loan originator licensee against whom the award was made.

After the department pays a small claims judgment under this section, the department is subrogated to the rights of the person to whom the money was awarded under the judgment.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am §§ 70, 71 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.710.
Maximum liability.

Payment of a fund claim may not exceed $15,000 for each claimant and $15,000 for each mortgage loan transaction regardless of the number of persons injured or the number of pieces of residential property involved in the mortgage loan transaction.

The maximum liability for fund claims against one mortgage loan originator licensee may not exceed $50,000.

If the $50,000 liability limit under (b) of this section is insufficient to pay in full the valid fund claims of all persons who have filed fund claims against one mortgage loan originator licensee, the $50,000 shall be distributed among the claimants in the ratio that their individual fund claims bear to the aggregate of valid fund claims against that mortgage loan originator licensee. The department shall distribute the money among the persons entitled to share in the recovery without regard to the order in which their fund claims were filed.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am §§ 72, 73 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.715.
Other rights of claimant.

The rights granted to a claimant under AS

06.60.500

—

06.60.750

do not limit any other cause of action the claimant may have against a mortgage loan originator.

History.

(§ 74 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.720.
Order of fund claim payment.

If the money appropriated to the department for payment under AS

06.60.520

—

06.60.750

is insufficient to satisfy an award under AS

06.60.680

for a fund claim, the department shall, when sufficient money has been appropriated to the department for the purpose, satisfy unpaid fund claims in the order the fund claims were originally filed, plus accumulated interest at the rate allowed under AS

45.45.010(a)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.60.730.
False claims or documents.

A person who files a notice, statement, or other document under AS

06.60.500

—

06.60.750

that contains a material misstatement of fact is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007)

Cross references. --

For penalties for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

for fines and

12.55.135

for imprisonment.

Sec. 06.60.740.
Right to subrogation.

When the department has paid to a claimant the sum awarded under AS

06.60.680

or

06.60.700

and any amount due under AS

06.60.720

, the department shall be subrogated to all of the rights of the claimant to the amount paid, and the claimant shall assign all right, title, and interest in that portion of the claim to the department. Money collected by the department on the claim shall be deposited in the fund.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007)

Sec. 06.60.745.
Reimbursement for expenses.

If the department pays all or a portion of a fund claim against a mortgage loan originator licensee under AS

06.60.680

or

06.60.700

, the department may recover from the mortgage loan originator licensee, in addition to the payment of the fund claim, the expenses incurred by the department to process and otherwise handle the fund claim.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 75 ch 61 SLA 2010)

Sec. 06.60.750.
Disciplinary action against a mortgage loan originator licensee.

Repayment in full of all obligations to the fund does not nullify or modify the effect of disciplinary proceedings brought against a mortgage loan originator licensee under this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 50 SLA 2007; am § 76 ch 61 SLA 2010)